Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Chapter 25. Stocking of Public Land.

Sec. 16.25.010.
Program adopted.

There is adopted a program of stocking land in the state with valuable game and fur-bearing animals that do not at present occur on the land.
The department is responsible for establishing priorities on the species of animals to be stocked and the area of the stocking. Priorities shall be based on the habitat requirements of the species, the population of native game animals present, and other factors that will effect the successful establishment of the species.

History.

(§ 39-7-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1970)

Secs. 16.25.020 — 16.25.060.
Projects enumerated; duties of department; stock and offspring property of state; unlawful taking; penalty.
[Repealed,
§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1970.]